District of Columbia statutes.
32-756

Grantee performance evaluation.

(a)

The Director shall monitor and evaluate the performance of grantees. The Director may terminate or modify grant agreements if the Director determines that a grantee’s performance is not in accordance with the grant. Grantees that have their grants cancelled or modified may appeal the Director’s action pursuant to § 2-510.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement this chapter. The rules shall be issued within 120 days of June 8, 2006.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 207, 53 DCR 2602
Occupational safety and health, planning, repeal of this subchapter, see § 32-1124.